Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.340

Interagency disputes—Alternative dispute resolution—Exception.

RCW 43.17.320 and 43.17.330 shall not apply to any state agency that is a party to a lawsuit, which: (1) Impleads another state agency into the lawsuit when necessary for the administration of justice; or (2) files a notice of appeal, petitions for review, or makes other filings subject to time limits, in order to preserve legal rights and remedies.

[ 1993 c 279 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—1993 c 279: See note following RCW 43.17.320.